Maine, session 132, LD1635.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §2532, as amended by PL 2019, c. 288, §2, is further amended
to read:
§2532. Referendum recount procedure
In the case of a referendum, a recount must be granted upon written application of 10%
or 100, whichever is less, of the registered voters in the municipality, except that,
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if a municipal referendum passes or
fails by less than 1% of all the votes cast in the referendum, including any blank ballots
cast, a recount may be conducted upon the majority vote of the municipal officers. The
application must designate a person to be the official representative of the registered voters
requesting the recount including the person's legal name, mailing address, residence
address and telephone number. An official representative for the registered voters opposing
the recount may be established by submission of an affidavit signed by 10 registered voters
of the municipality. The time limits, rules and all other matters applying to candidates
under section 2531‑B apply equally to a referendum recount, except that provisions in
section 2531‑B applicable to the candidate requesting the recount and candidates not
requesting the recount apply, for purposes of this section, to the official representative of
the referendum recount and the official representative, if any, of the voters opposed to the
recount, respectively.
Page 1 - 132LR1818(03)